Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3

Operation and Powers

7-39-301. Directors — Qualifications — Number — Expenses — Term — Removal.

The corporation shall have a board of directors in which all of the powers of the corporation shall be vested and which shall consist of any number of directors, no fewer than three (3), each of whom shall meet the qualifications for a director as set forth in § 7-39-103.

The directors shall serve without compensation, except that they shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in and about the performance of their duties under this part.

If the corporation is formed by a board, commission or other instrumentality of a municipality having jurisdiction, control and management of an energy distribution system as provided in §§ 7-39-102(4) and 7-39-201, the directors shall be appointed by the creating board, commission or instrumentality, or its successor, unless the board, commission or instrumentality waives the right to do so, and, if such waiver occurs or the corporation is formed by the body in which the general legislative powers of the municipality are vested, the directors shall be nominated by the mayor or other chief executive officer and elected by the governing body of the associated municipality. If a corporation is formed by another energy acquisition corporation, the directors shall be appointed by the board of directors of the creating energy acquisition corporation. Directors shall be elected so that they shall hold office for staggered terms. At the time of the election of the first board of directors, the governing body of the municipality shall divide the directors into three (3) groups containing as near equal whole numbers as may be possible. The first term of the directors included in the first group shall be two (2) years, the first term of the directors included in the second group shall be four (4) years, the first term of the directors included in the third group shall be six (6) years, and thereafter the terms of all directors shall be six (6) years. If, at the expiration of any term of office of any director, a successor has not been elected, then the director whose term of office shall have expired shall continue to hold office until the director's successor shall be so elected.

The governing body of the associated municipality may remove a director for cause, and may appoint a director to serve out the term of any office that becomes vacant for any reason.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 9; T.C.A., § 6-4209; Acts 1997, ch. 93, § 6; 1999, ch. 345, § 8; 2007, ch. 263, § 5.

7-39-302. Corporate powers.

Every energy acquisition corporation has the following powers, unless expressly limited by the terms of the certificate of incorporation, together with all powers incidental to the powers stated in this section or necessary for the performance of those stated in this section, to:

Have succession by its corporate name for the period specified in the certificate of incorporation, unless sooner dissolved;

Sue and be sued and prosecute and defend at law or in equity, in any court having jurisdiction of the subject matter and of the parties;

Acquire, hold, deal in and dispose of property of all kinds, or any interest in property, for the purposes of the corporation, including, but not limited to, acquiring any kind of interest, alone or jointly with others, in any lands or interests in lands productive of natural gas and other hydrocarbons, or deemed to be potentially productive of natural gas and other hydrocarbons, and any contract rights relative to the production of natural gas and other hydrocarbons, including drilling rights, operating rights, royalties, overriding royalties and other rights, titles and interests;

Engage in the acquisition of natural gas and natural gas substitutes by any means, including:

Exploration for and development of natural gas reservoirs, alone or in conjunction with others, including geological surveys, the drilling of wells and all activities related to exploration for and development of natural gas reservoirs;

Acquisition of supplies of natural gas or natural gas substitutes by purchase from natural gas producers, pipeline companies and others; and

Acquisition of any other hydrocarbons or other minerals that may be found incidentally to the acquisition of natural gas or natural gas substitutes;

Acquire or construct, own, lease to or from others and operate pipelines, natural gas processing plants, underground and aboveground storage reservoirs for natural gas, pumping stations, terminal facilities and liquefied natural gas facilities, facilities for the handling or processing of natural gas substitutes and other hydrocarbons acquired in the course of the operations of the corporation, and all other facilities necessary or convenient for carrying out the purposes of the corporations;

Acquire, hold, deal in and dispose of property of all kinds, or any interest in property, for the purposes of the corporation, including, but not limited to, acquiring, owning, operating, leasing and disposing of rights, titles and interest of every kind and nature in electrical power production, distribution and transmission facilities located within or outside the state, including facilities of every kind and nature, both real and personal, for the procurement of raw materials for the production of electrical energy;

Enter into any contract or arrangement with any gas producer, pipeline company or other seller of natural gas or natural gas substitutes, whether within or outside the state, providing for the acquisition of natural gas and natural gas substitutes containing such terms, covenants, representations, warranties and provisions and being for such period or duration as shall be determined by the board of directors of the corporation. In connection with any contract to acquire natural gas or natural gas substitutes, the corporation may enter into commodity price exchange or swap agreements, agreements establishing price floors or ceilings, or both, or other price hedging contracts with any person or entity under such terms and conditions as the board of directors of the corporation may determine, including, but not limited to, provisions permitting the corporation to indemnify or otherwise pay any person or entity for any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination of the agreement or default under the agreement. When entering into any such contract or arrangement or any such swap, exchange or hedging agreement evidencing a transaction bearing a reasonable relationship to this state and also to another state or nation, the corporation may agree in the written contract or agreement that the rights and remedies of the parties to the contract or agreement shall be governed by the laws of this state or the laws of such other state or nation; provided, that jurisdiction over any corporation against which an action on such a contract or agreement is brought shall lie solely in a court located in Tennessee that would otherwise have jurisdiction of an action brought in contract against such corporation;

Acquire electrical power by any contract or arrangement from the Tennessee Valley authority or any similar governmental agency or any other person or entity whether within or outside the state, and acquire any kind of interest, alone or with others, in any electrical power production or transmission facilities, including all substations and other facilities necessary for electric power production or transmission or related to electric power production or transmission, whether inside or outside the state, and enter into any contract or arrangement in connection with electric power production or transmission. Any such contracts authorized in this subdivision (8) shall contain such terms, covenants, representations, warranties and provisions and be for such period or duration as shall be determined by the board of directors of the corporation. In connection with any contract to acquire electrical power, the corporation may enter into commodity price exchange or swap agreements, agreements establishing price floors or ceilings, or both, or other price hedging contracts with any person or entity under such terms and conditions as the board of directors of the corporation may determine, including, but not limited to, provisions permitting the corporation to indemnify or otherwise pay any person or entity for any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination of the agreement, or default under the contract. When entering into any such contract or arrangement or any such swap, exchange or hedging agreement evidencing a transaction bearing a reasonable relationship to this state and also to another state or nation, the corporation may agree in the written contract or agreement that the rights and remedies of the parties to the contract or agreement shall be governed by the laws of this state or the laws of such other state or nation; provided, that jurisdiction over any corporation against which an action on such a contract or agreement is brought shall lie solely in a court located in Tennessee that would otherwise have jurisdiction of an action brought in contract against such corporation;

Sell, exchange or interchange natural gas or natural gas substitutes and to provide by sale or otherwise, an adequate, dependable and economical gas supply to the corporation's associated municipalities; the state and its departments, agencies, instrumentalities and political subdivisions; gas utility systems either privately or publicly owned; the United States government; other energy acquisition corporations established pursuant to this chapter or under the laws of another jurisdiction; and private persons and entities, whether any of such consumers are inside or outside this state; to establish prices to be paid for such gas or gas substitutes and pricing structures with respect to gas or gas substitutes, including provision for price rebates, discounts, and dividends; and, in connection with any such sales, exchanges or interchanges, to act as agent for such consumers, to secure gas contracts and arrangements with other entities or persons, to make contracts for the sale, exchange, interchange, pooling, transmission, distribution, or storage of gas and fuel of any kind for any such purposes, inside or outside this state, and to transmit gas both for itself and on behalf of others;

Sell, exchange or interchange electrical power and to provide by sale or otherwise, an adequate, dependable and economical electrical power supply to the corporation's associated municipalities; the state and its departments, agencies, instrumentalities and political subdivisions; electrical power utility systems either privately or publicly owned; the United States government; other energy acquisition corporations established pursuant to this chapter or under the laws of another jurisdiction; and private persons and entities, whether any of such consumers are inside or outside this state; to establish prices to be paid for such electrical power and pricing structures with respect to electrical power, including provision for rebates, discounts, and dividends; and, in connection with any such sales, exchanges or interchanges, to act as agent for such consumers, to secure electrical power contracts and arrangements with other entities or persons, to make contracts for the sale, exchange, interchange, pooling, transmission, and distribution of electrical power for any such purposes, inside or outside this state, and to transmit electrical power both for itself and on behalf of others;

Conduct its meetings by telephonic, electronic or other means of communication, in accordance with the requirements of § 8-44-108 as if the corporation were an agency of state government;

Provide to an associated municipality, any entity purchasing gas or electrical energy from the corporation, or any other energy acquisition corporation, transportation and storage capacity, and management services associated therewith, energy supply development and management, technical, financial, informational, promotional, engineering and educational services related to the provision of gas and electrical energy; notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, any engineering services will be provided in compliance with title 62, chapter 2;

Issue bonds and notes for the borrowing of money;

As security for the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds or notes so issued, and any agreements made in connection with the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds or notes, and as security for the obligations of the corporation in connection with the acquisition of supplies of natural gas or electric power by purchase from producers, distributors or others, grant liens upon or otherwise encumber any or all of its property and assets, whether then owned or thereafter acquired, and pledge the revenues and receipts from the property and assets, or from any part of the property and assets, and assign and pledge all or any part of its interest in and rights under any leases, sale contracts or other contracts relating to the leases or sale contracts, so long as gas assets are not pledged or encumbered to secure bonds, notes or obligations for the acquisition of electrical power and electric assets are not pledged or encumbered to secure bonds, notes or obligations for the acquisition of natural gas and natural gas substitutes;

Employ and pay compensation to such employees and agents, including engineers, geologists, attorneys and other special consultants or other agents as the board of directors shall deem necessary for the business of the corporation;

Exercise all powers expressly given in its certificate of incorporation and establish bylaws and make all rules and regulations not inconsistent with the certificate of incorporation or the provisions of this chapter, deemed expedient for the management of the corporation's affairs; and

Install, read, maintain and remove water meters for an associated municipality or a municipality.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-4203; Acts 1997, ch. 93, §§ 7-10; 1999, ch. 345, §§ 9, 10; 2001, ch. 185, § 1; 2005, ch. 110, § 1.

7-39-303. Condemnation — Right-of-way for pipelines — Underground reservoirs — Land for pumping stations and other facilities — Use of public ways in municipalities.

An energy acquisition corporation has the right and power pursuant to title 29, chapter 17 to take and condemn lands, property, property rights, privileges and easements of others for:

The purpose of constructing, laying, repairing or extending its pipelines;

The development, construction and operation of underground and aboveground storage reservoirs for natural gas and natural gas substitutes;

Pumping stations, terminal facilities and other facilities reasonably necessary for carrying out the purposes of the corporation;

The construction of electrical power distribution, transmission and production facilities and all other facilities reasonably necessary or related to the purchase, distribution, or transmission of electrical power for use by electrical power distributors or any other person or entity; and

Access to any properties owned or used by such corporation.

None of the public streets, alleys, squares or highways within the corporate limits of any municipality in the state shall be entered upon or used by any such corporation for laying pipelines or electrical power transmission lines, or otherwise, until the consent of the legislative body of such municipality has been obtained, prescribing the terms on which the public streets, alleys, squares or highways may be entered upon or used.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-4204; Acts 1997, ch. 93, §§ 11-13.

Attorney General Opinions. Multi-county gas utility districts, OAG 93-56, 1993 Tenn. AG LEXIS 56 (9/2/93).

7-39-304. Loan — Guarantees and revenue bonds of a municipality.

Any associated municipality or any municipally-owned energy distribution system acting by resolution of the governing body of its associated municipality is hereby authorized and empowered to:

Make loans to its energy acquisition corporation;

Guarantee or assume the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds or notes issued by such corporation or the payment or performance of any obligations of the corporation incurred in connection with the purchase of gas or electrical power by the corporation;

Pledge the revenues of its energy distribution system to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds or notes of the corporation or to secure its guaranty of such bonds or notes;

Pledge the revenues of its energy distribution system to secure the payment of obligations incurred in connection with the purchase of gas or electrical power, as appropriate, by the corporation or to secure its guaranty of any such obligations.

Any loan, or payment under such guarantee or pledge, shall be made solely out of the funds otherwise available to the energy distribution system for the benefit of which the bonds or notes were issued or the obligations were incurred and shall not be a general obligation of the associated municipality. Any loan, guarantee or pledge of revenues shall be subject to any contractual limitations undertaken by the associated municipality or energy distribution system for the incurrence of indebtedness or the lending of its credit to others.

Any pledge of, or lien on, revenues of the energy distribution system to secure the payment of any bonds, notes or obligations of such corporation pursuant to this chapter shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge or lien is created or granted and shall inure to the benefit of the holder or holders of such bonds or notes or the obligee under any such obligation until the payment or satisfaction in full of the obligation. The priority of any pledge or lien with respect to competing pledges or liens shall be determined by the date such pledge or lien is created or granted. Neither the resolution, the indenture, nor any other instrument granting, creating or giving notice of the pledge or lien need be filed or recorded to preserve or protect the validity or priority of such pledge or lien.

Any pledge or lien created or granted pursuant to the terms of this section shall not be subject to the mortgage tax imposed by § 67-4-409(b) and any other tax that is imposed upon the privilege of recording any instrument giving notice of the creation of a lien, security interest or pledge, and such exemption shall apply to any transaction to which the municipality is a party pursuant to this chapter, whether as the secured party or the debtor.

Any associated municipality is hereby authorized to issue its revenue bonds in the manner provided by title 9, chapter 21 for the purpose of raising funds to lend to its energy acquisition corporation, such revenue bonds to be payable solely from the revenues derived from the energy distribution system owned by such associated municipality.

An associated municipality shall not have the power to assume or guarantee bonds, notes or other obligations of a corporation in such a way as to pledge the full faith and credit and taxing power of the associated municipality to the payment of the obligations.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 10; T.C.A. § 6-4210; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 27; 1997, ch. 93, §§ 14, 15; 1999, ch. 345, §§ 11-14.

7-39-305. Issuance of bonds — Restrictions on payment — Additional issues — Refunding — Construction — Interest rates — Sale of bonds — Contracts and agreements — Liability — Calculating applicable formula rate.

All bonds issued by the corporation shall be payable solely out of the revenues and receipts derived from the corporation's activities pursuant to the powers and purposes set forth in this part; provided, that notes issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds may be retired out of the proceeds of such bonds. Such bonds may be executed and delivered by the corporation, at any time and from time to time, may be in such form and denominations and of such terms and maturities, may be in registered or bearer form, either as to principal or interest, or both, may be payable in such installments and at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from the date of issuance, may be payable at such place or places whether within or without the state of Tennessee, may bear interest at such rate or rates payable at such time or times and at such place or places and evidenced in such manner, may be executed by such officers of the corporation, and may contain such provisions not inconsistent with this part, as shall be provided in the proceedings of the board of directors whereunder the bonds shall be authorized to be issued. If deemed advisable by the board of directors, there may be retained in the proceedings under which any bonds of the corporation are authorized to be issued an option to redeem all or any part of the bonds as may be specified in such proceedings, at such price or prices and after such notice or notices and on such terms and conditions as may be set forth in such proceedings and as may be briefly recited in the face of the bonds, but nothing contained in this section shall be construed to confer on the corporation any right or option to redeem any bonds except as may be provided in the proceedings under which they shall be issued. Any bonds of the corporation may be sold at public or private sale in such manner, at such price and from time to time as may be determined by the board of directors of the corporation to be most advantageous, and the corporation may pay all expenses, premiums and commissions that its board of directors may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance of the bonds. Issuance by the corporation of one (1) or more series of bonds for one (1) or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other bonds in connection with the same project or any other project, but the proceedings under which any subsequent bonds may be issued shall recognize and protect any prior pledge or mortgage made for any prior issue of bonds. Proceeds of bonds issued by the corporation may be used for the promotion of any of the purposes of the corporation as set forth in this chapter, including the establishment of a reasonable reserve fund for the payment of principal of and interest on such bonds in the event of a deficiency in the revenues and receipts available for the payment. Any bonds of a corporation may be issued bearing a fixed interest rate or a rate that varies from time to time or a rate that is established from time to time during the term of the bonds and may be issued granting to the owners of the bonds put rights and such other rights as the board of directors of the corporation shall determine. In connection with the issuance of its bonds, a corporation is authorized to enter into such additional agreements as shall be necessary to facilitate the issuance and sale of the bonds or establishment of the interest rate or rates, including agreements providing for liquidity and credit enhancement, and reimbursement agreements relating to the bonds.

Any bonds or notes of the corporation at any time outstanding may, at any time and from time to time, be refunded by the corporation by the issuance of its refunding bonds in such amount as the board of directors may deem necessary, but not exceeding:

The principal amount of the obligations being refinanced;

Applicable redemption premiums on the refunding bonds;

Unpaid interest of such obligations to the date of delivery or exchange of the refunding bonds;

In the event the proceeds from the sale of the refunding bonds are to be deposited in trust as provided in subdivision (d)(2), interest to accrue on such obligations from the date of delivery to the date of maturity or to the first redemption date, whichever shall be earlier; and

Expenses, premiums and commissions of the corporation deemed by the board of directors to be necessary in connection with the issuance of the refunding bonds.

Any such refunding may be effected whether the obligations to be refunded shall have then matured or shall thereafter mature, either by the exchange of the refunding bonds for the obligations to be refunded by the refunding bonds with the consent of the holders of the obligations so to be refunded, or by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds of the sale to the payment of the obligations to be refunded by the refunding bonds, and regardless of whether or not the obligations to be refunded were issued in connection with the same projects or separate projects, and regardless of whether or not the obligations proposed to be refunded shall be payable on the same date or different dates or shall be due serially or otherwise.

The principal proceeds from the sale of any refunding bonds shall be applied only as follows either to:

The immediate payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded; or

The extent not required for the immediate payment of the obligations being refunded, then the proceeds shall be deposited in trust to provide for the payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded, and to pay any expenses incurred in connection with such refunding, but may also be used to pay interest on the refunding bonds prior to the retirement of the obligations being refunded. Money in any such trust fund may be invested in direct obligations of or obligations the principal of and interest on which are guaranteed by the United States government, or obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States government, or in certificates of deposit issued by a bank or trust company located in the state of Tennessee, if such certificates shall be secured by a pledge of any of such obligations having an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, equal at least to the principal amount of the certificates so secured. Nothing in this subdivision (d)(2) shall be construed as a limitation on the duration of any deposit in trust for the retirement of obligations being refunded but which shall not have matured and which shall not be presently redeemable.

All bonds, refunding bonds and the interest coupons applicable to the bonds are hereby made and shall be construed to be negotiable instruments.

With respect to all or any portion of any issue of bonds issued or anticipated to be issued under this section, at any time during the term of the bonds, and upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that the contracts and agreements authorized in this section are in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations as set forth in subsection (i), a corporation by resolution may authorize and enter into interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings, or both, and other interest rate hedging agreements under such terms and conditions as the board of directors of the corporation may determine, including, but not limited to, provisions permitting the corporation to pay to or receive from any person or entity any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination of the agreement or default under such agreement.

The governing body of a corporation may enter into an agreement to sell its bonds under this part providing for delivery of its bonds on a date greater than ninety (90) days and not greater than five (5) years, or such greater period of time if approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, from the date of execution of such agreement only upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that such an agreement or contract of a corporation to sell its bonds as authorized in this subsection (g) is in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations adopted or promulgated by the state funding board in accordance with subsection (i). Agreements to sell bonds for delivery ninety (90) days or less from the date of execution of the agreement to sell the bonds do not require a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Prior to the adoption or promulgation by the state funding board of guidelines, rules or regulations with respect to the contracts and agreements authorized in subsections (f) and (g), a corporation may enter into such contracts or agreements to the extent otherwise authorized in this chapter or in any other law, notwithstanding subsections (f) and (g). Nothing in this section is intended to alter any existing authority in this chapter or in any other law otherwise providing authority for a corporation to enter into the contracts or agreements described in subsections (f) and (g) heretofore entered into prior to the adoption or promulgation by the state funding board of guidelines, rules or regulations.

The state funding board shall establish guidelines, rules or regulations with respect to the agreements and contracts authorized in subsections (f) and (g), which may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

The conditions under which such agreements or contracts can be entered into;

The methods by which such contracts are to be solicited and procured;

The form and content such contracts shall take;

The aspects of risk exposure associated with such contracts;

The standards and procedures for counterparty selection, including rating criteria;

The procurement of credit enhancement, liquidity facilities, or the setting aside of reserves in connection with such contracts or agreements;

The methods of securing the financial interest in such contracts;

The methods to be used to reflect such contracts in the corporation's financial statements;

Financial monitoring and periodic assessment of such contracts by the corporation;

The application and source of nonperiodic payments; and

Educational requirements for officials of any corporation responsible for approving any such contract or agreement.

Prior to the adoption by the board of directors of the corporation of a resolution authorizing such contract or agreement, a request shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for a report finding that such contract or agreement is in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations of the state funding board. Within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the request, the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall determine whether the contract or agreement substantially complies with the guidelines, rules or regulations and shall report on the compliance to the corporation. If the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finds that the contract or agreement complies with the guidelines, rules or regulations of the state funding board or the comptroller of the treasury shall fail to report within the fifteen-day period, then the corporation may take such action with respect to the proposed contract or agreement as it deems advisable in accordance with this section and the guidelines, rules or regulations of the state funding board. If the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finds that such contract or agreement is not in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations, then the corporation is not authorized to enter into such contract or agreement. The guidelines, rules or regulations shall provide for a process for the appeal of a determination of noncompliance.

Neither an associated municipality nor any municipality, acquisition corporation or other entity purchasing natural gas or electrical power from the corporation shall in any event be liable for the payment of the principal of or interest on any bonds, notes or other obligations of the corporation, or for the performance of any pledge, mortgage, obligation or agreement of any kind whatsoever that may be undertaken by the corporation and none of the bonds, notes or other obligations of the corporation nor any of its agreements or obligations shall be construed to constitute an indebtedness of any associated municipality, acquisition corporation or other entity purchasing natural gas or electrical power from the acquisition corporation, within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision whatsoever, except to the extent the associated municipality, acquisition corporation, or other entity shall have guaranteed or assumed the payment of any bonds, notes or other obligations of such corporation or pledged its revenues to the payment of any bonds, notes or obligations of the corporation pursuant to the terms of § 7-39-304 or of any other provision of applicable law.

When entering into an interest rate agreement authorized by this section, a corporation may secure its obligations under the agreement, including its obligation for termination or other nonperiodic payments, with the revenues available to secure the bonds with respect to which such interest rate agreement is entered into.

For purposes of calculating the “applicable formula rate” under § 47-14-103 and the related provisions of title 47, chapter 14, to determine the maximum effective rate applicable to bonds or other obligations issued by energy acquisition corporations, the language “four (4) percentage points above the average prime loan rate” in the definition of “formula rate” in § 47-14-102 shall be replaced with the language “seven (7) percentage points above the average prime loan rate.” This subsection (l ) shall apply to any bonds or other obligations issued by energy acquisition corporations on or before June 30, 2012.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 11; T.C.A., § 6-4211; Acts 1999, ch. 345, §§ 15-17; 2004, ch. 589, § 4; 2010, ch. 693, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act clarifying and increasing the maximum rate that may be charged on debt issues by energy acquisition corporations, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 693.

7-39-306. Security for payment of bonds — Default — Bondholders' remedies.

The principal of and interest on any bonds issued by the corporation shall be secured by a pledge of the revenues and receipts out of which the principal and interest shall be made payable, and may be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust covering all or any part of the properties of the corporation, or by an assignment and pledge of all or any part of the corporation's real or personal assets.

The resolution under which the bonds are authorized to be issued and any such mortgage or deed of trust may contain any agreements and provisions respecting the maintenance of the projects covered by the resolution, the fixing and collecting of rents or payments with respect to any projects or portions of projects covered by such resolution, mortgage or deed of trust, the creation and maintenance of special funds from such revenues and from the proceeds of such bonds, and the rights and remedies available in the event of default, all as the board of directors shall deem advisable and not in conflict with this section.

Each pledge, agreement, mortgage and deed of trust made for the benefit or security of any of the bonds of the corporation shall continue effective until the principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of which the pledge, agreement, mortgage and deed of trust were made shall have been fully paid.

In the event of default in such payment or in any agreements of the corporation made as a part of the contract under which the bonds were issued, whether contained in the proceedings authorizing the bonds or in any mortgage and deed of trust executed as security for the bonds, such payment or agreement may be enforced by suit, mandamus, the appointment of a receiver in equity, or by foreclosure of any such mortgage and deed of trust, or any one (1) or more of such remedies.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 12; T.C.A., § 6-4212.

7-39-307. Exemption from taxation — Securities.

The corporation is hereby declared to be performing a public function in behalf of the municipality with respect to which the corporation is organized and to be a public instrumentality of such municipality. Accordingly, the corporation and all properties at any time owned by it, except as provided in subsection (b), and the income and revenues from the properties and all bonds issued by it and the income from the bonds shall be exempt from all taxation in the state, including the mortgage tax imposed by § 67-4-409(b) and any other tax that is imposed upon the privilege of recording any instrument giving notice of the creation of a lien, security interest or pledge, and such exemption shall apply to any transaction to which the corporation is a party whether as the secured party or the debtor. Also, for purposes of the Tennessee Securities Act of 1980, compiled as title 48, chapter 1, part 1, bonds issued by the corporation shall be deemed to be securities issued by a public instrumentality or a political subdivision of the state.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an energy acquisition corporation, established pursuant to this chapter, that acquires an ongoing concern engaged in the sale and distribution of liquefied petroleum gas (propane) may enter into agreements for payments in lieu of taxes, referred to as “tax equivalents”, with any local government to which the acquired concern formerly paid ad valorem property tax.

The amount of such payments shall be fixed at the amount of ad valorem taxes that would be otherwise due and payable by the business based upon the assessed value of the property that would be subject to tax if such business had not been acquired by the energy acquisition corporation. Such payments shall only be used in the same manner and for the same purposes as ad valorem taxes collected by the recipient local government.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 13; T.C.A., § 6-4213; Acts 1999, ch. 345, § 18; 2010, ch. 1134, §§ 50, 51.

7-39-308. Validity of bonds.

Bonds bearing the signature of officers in office on the date of the signing of the bonds shall be valid and binding obligations, notwithstanding that before the delivery of the bonds and payment for the bonds any or all the persons whose signatures appear on the bonds shall have ceased to be officers of the energy acquisition corporation issuing the bonds.

The validity of the bonds shall not be dependent on nor affected by the validity or regularity of any proceedings relating to the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of any properties for which the bonds are issued.

The resolution authorizing the bonds may provide that the bonds shall contain a recital that they are issued pursuant to this chapter, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and of the regularity of their issuance.

Acts 1977, ch. 299, § 14; T.C.A., § 6-4214; Acts 1997, ch. 93, § 16.